District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.47

Nursing care standard.

(a)

When a recipient is receiving nursing care in the home of a relative, the Mayor will apply the standard for room, board, and care in an intermediate care facility, based on the kind and extent of care required.

(b)

The rate for care in a foster home or for residential placement shall be the same as that for the lowest rate in an intermediate care facility.

(c)

The rates paid for intermediate care, foster home care, or residential placement shall be paid at 100% of the standard as the rates were not increased in the 1970 budget.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 547, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.47.